Louisiana, session 2026, SB173.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 2415(B) is hereby amended and reenacted
and Code of Civil Procedure Art. 2415(C) and (D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2415. Delivery of property or payment of indebtedness to sheriff
* * *
B. Notwithstanding the requirements provided in Paragraph A of this
Article, if the garnishee is a federally insured financial institution and admits
in its answer that it has in its possession funds on deposit belonging to the
judgment debtor, and the garnishee has received no notice of opposition to the
garnishment, then, if the funds on deposit are one thousand dollars or less, the
garnishee may, without further court order, deliver the funds immediately to
the sheriff. Delivery or payment to the sheriff discharges the garnishee's
obligation to the judgment debtor to the extent of the delivery or payment to the
sheriff.
C. Notwithstanding the requirements provided in Paragraph A of this
Article, if the garnishee is a federally insured financial institution and admits
in its answer that it has in its possession funds on deposit belonging to the
judgment debtor, and the garnishee has received no notice of opposition to the
garnishment, and if the funds on deposit are greater than one thousand dollars,
then the garnishee may, upon waiting a period of thirty days after the filing of
its garnishment answer, and without further court order, deliver the funds on
deposit to the sheriff. Delivery or payment to the sheriff discharges the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 173 ENROLLED
garnishee's obligation to the judgment debtor to the extent of the delivery or
payment to the sheriff.
D. This Article does not apply to garnishment of wages, salaries, tips reported
to the employer, or commissions.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.